California statutes. Harbors and Navigation Code
(b) Any loan made pursuant to Section 71.4 or 76.3 for, respectively, a project or a recreational marina that is required, pursuant to Section 776, to provide vessel pumpout facilities shall be subject to the following express conditions: 

(1) The pumpout facility shall be opened to public use within six months of receiving any funds, or when any part of the project is opened to public use, whichever is later, unless the department determines that the facility cannot be opened to public use within this period due to circumstances beyond the control of the borrower.

(2) The borrower shall agree to budget funds each year for the maintenance and operation of the pumpout facility for its expected life.

(3) The location of the pumpout facility shall be publicized, by any convenient means available, and shall be marked with a distinctive and prominent sign that is readily identifiable from offshore locations.

(4) Charges imposed for the use of the pumpout facility shall not, in the aggregate, exceed the cost of maintaining and operating the pumpout facility and a pro rata share of the amount necessary for repayment of the loan.

(5) The portion of the loan equal to the cost of the pumpout facility shall become immediately due, if the borrower does not perform any requirement imposed pursuant to this subdivision.

(c) Any lessee or concessionaire that is required, pursuant to Section 776, to provide vessel pumpout facilities, shall be required through the lease or concession contract to comply with requirements that are not less restrictive than the requirements imposed by paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (b). 

(d) Any loan made pursuant to Section 71.4 or 76.3, and any concession contract entered into pursuant to Section 72, shall be subject to the express condition that restrooms be opened to public use within six months of the date the project is opened to public use, unless the department determines that the facility cannot be opened to public use within this period due to circumstances beyond the control of the borrower.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1428, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 4. MASTERS, CREWS AND CARGOES [790. - 876.]



CHAPTER 1. Scope of Division [790. - 790.]

790.

The provisions of this Division shall not be construed to apply to the extent to which they are not within the legislative power of this state, except in so far as they may be permitted to apply under the provisions of the Constitution of the United States or the acts of Congress.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Ship Masters and Cargoes [800. - 821.]

800.

The master of a vessel is appointed by and holds his appointment at the pleasure of the owner.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

801.

The master of a vessel shall be always on board when it is entering or leaving a port, harbor, or river unless the vessel is in charge of a mate who possesses a master’s license.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

802.

On entering or leaving a port, harbor, or river, the master of a vessel, the navigation of which is not in charge of a pilot, licensed for that port, harbor, or river, shall take a pilot if one offers himself. While the pilot is on board the navigation of the vessel devolves on him.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

803.

The master of a vessel may enforce the obedience of the mate and seamen to his lawful commands by confinement and other reasonable corporal punishment; but the master is responsible for the abuse of his power.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

804.

The master of a vessel may confine any person on board, during a voyage, for wilful disobedience to his lawful commands.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

805.

If, during a voyage, the vessel’s supplies fail, the master, with the advice of the officers, may compel persons who have private supplies on board to surrender them for the common want, or payment of, or on giving security for, their value.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

806.

The master of a vessel shall not abandon it during the voyage, without the advice of the other officers.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

807.

The master of a vessel, upon abandoning it, shall carry with him, so far as it is in his power, the money and the most valuable of the goods on board, under penalty of being personally responsible. If the articles thus taken are lost from causes beyond his control, he is exonerated from liability.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

808.

The master of a vessel, who engages for a common profit on the cargo, shall not trade on his own account, and if he does, he shall account to his employer for all profits thus made by him.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

809.

The master of a vessel shall use great care and diligence in the performance of his duties, and he is responsible for all damage occasioned by his negligence.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

810.

The master of a vessel is a general agent for its owner in all matters concerning the vessel.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

811.

The master of a vessel has authority to borrow money on the credit of its owner, if it is necessary to enable him to complete the voyage, and if neither the owner nor his proper agent for such matters can be consulted without injurious delay.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

812.

During a voyage, the master of a vessel is a general agent for each of the owners of the cargo, and has authority to do whatever they might do for the preservation of their respective interests, but he can not sell or hypothecate the cargo, except in the cases mentioned in this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

813.

The master of a vessel may procure all its necessary repairs and supplies, may engage cargo and passengers for carriage, and, in a foreign port, may enter into a charter-party. His contracts for these purposes bind the owner to the full amount of the value of the vessel and freightage.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

814.

The master of a vessel may hypothecate the vessel, freightage, and cargo, and sell part of the cargo, in the cases prescribed by the articles on bottomry and respondentia, and in no others, except that the master may also sell the cargo, or any part of it, short of the port of destination, if it is found to be of such perishable nature, or in such damaged condition that if left on board or reshipped it would be entirely lost or seriously endanger the interests of its owners.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

815.

When a vessel, whether foreign or domestic, is seriously damaged, or the voyage is otherwise broken up beyond the possibility of pursuing it, the master, in case of necessity, may sell the vessel without instructions from the owners, unless by the earliest use of ordinary means of communication he can inform the owners and await their instructions.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

816.

The master of a vessel may sell the cargo if the voyage is broken up beyond the possibility of pursuing it, and no other vessel can be obtained to carry it to its destination, and the sale is otherwise absolutely necessary.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

817.

The master of a vessel in case of its capture may engage to pay a ransom for it in money or in part of the cargo, and his engagement will bind the vessel, freightage, and cargo.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

818.

The power of the master of a vessel to bind its owner, or the owners of the cargo, ceases upon the abandonment of the vessel and freightage to insurers.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

819.

Unless otherwise expressly agreed, or unless the contracting parties give exclusive credit to the owner, the master of a vessel is personally liable upon his contracts relative to the vessel, even when the owner is also liable.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

820.

The master of a vessel is liable to third persons for the acts or negligence of persons employed in its navigation, whether appointed by him or not, to the same extent as the owner of the vessel; but neither the owner nor the master of a vessel is responsible for the negligence of a pilot whom he is bound by law to employ, unless an option is allowed between pilots, some of whom are competent, or unless he is required only to pay compensation to the pilot, but is not required to use his services.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

821.

The owner of a vessel is bound to pay to the owner of the cargo, at the time of arrival of the vessel at the port of the destination, the market value of that portion of the cargo which has been sold to enable the master to pay for the necessary repairs and supplies of the vessel.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2.5. Ship’s Managers [830. - 834.]

830.

The general agent for the owners, in respect to the care of a ship and freight, is called the manager. If he is a part owner, he is also called the managing owner.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

831.

Unless otherwise directed, it is the duty of the manager of a vessel to provide for its complete seaworthiness; to take care of it in port; and to see that it is provided with necessary papers, with a proper master, mate, and crew, and supplies of provisions and stores.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

832.

A managing owner is presumed to be without right to compensation for his own services.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

833.

A manager may make contracts requisite for the performance of his duties. He may enter into charter parties, make contracts for carriage, settle for freightage, and adjust averages.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

834.

Without special authority a manager shall not borrow money or give up the lien for freightage, or purchase a cargo, or bind the owners of the vessel to an insurance.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Mates and Seamen [860. - 876.]

860.

The mate is the officer next in rank to the master, and in case of the master’s disability the mate becomes the master. By so doing he does not lose any of his rights as mate.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

861.

All persons employed in the navigation of a vessel, or upon a voyage, other than the master and mate, are seamen within the provisions of this code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

862.

The mate and seamen of a vessel are engaged by the master, and may be discharged by him at any period of the voyage for wilful and persistent disobedience or gross disqualification, but they can not be discharged for other reasons before the termination of the voyage.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

863.

A mate or seaman is not bound to go to sea in a vessel that is not seaworthy. If there is reasonable doubt of its seaworthiness he may refuse to proceed until a proper survey has been had.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

864.

A seaman can not by agreement be deprived of his lien upon the vessel, or of any remedy for the recovery of his wages to which he would otherwise have been entitled. Any agreement, by which he consents to abandon his right to wages in case of the loss of the vessel, or to abandon any right he may have or may obtain in the nature of salvage is void.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

865.

A seaman can not, by special agreement, impair any of his rights, or add to any of his obligations, as defined by law, unless he fully understands the effect of the agreement and receives for it a fair compensation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

866.

Except as otherwise provided by law, the wages of seamen are due when, and so far only as, freightage is earned, unless the loss of freightage is due to the fault of the owner or master.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

867.

The right of a mate or seaman to wages and provisions begins either from the time he begins work, or from the time specified in the agreement for his beginning work, or from his presence on board, whichever first happens.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

868.

If a voyage is broken up before departure of the vessel, the seamen shall be paid for the time they have served, and they may retain for their indemnity any advances they may have received.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

869.

When a mate or seaman is wrongfully discharged, or is driven to leave the vessel by the cruelty of the master on the voyage, it is then ended with respect to him, and he may recover his full wages.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

870.

If a vessel is wrecked or lost, a seaman is entitled to his wages up to the time of the loss or wreck, whether freightage has been earned or not, if he exerts himself to the utmost to save the vessel, cargo, and stores.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

871.

A certificate from the master or chief surviving officer of a vessel, to the effect that a seaman exerted himself to the utmost to save the vessel, cargo, and stores, is presumptive evidence of the fact.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

872.

When a mate or seaman is prevented from rendering service by illness or injury, incurred without his fault in the discharge of his duty on the voyage, or by being wrongfully discharged, or by a capture of the vessel, he is entitled to wages notwithstanding. In case of a capture, a ratable deduction for salvage shall be made.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

873.

If a mate or seaman becomes sick or disabled during the voyage, without his fault, the expense of furnishing him with suitable medical advice, medicine, attendance, and other provision for his wants, shall be borne by the vessel till the close of the voyage.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

874.

If a mate or seaman dies during the voyage, his personal representatives are entitled to his wages to the time of his death, if he would have been entitled to them had he lived to the end of the voyage.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

875.

A mate or seaman who deserts his vessel without cause, or who is justifiably discharged by the master during the voyage for misconduct, or for a theft of any part of the cargo or appurtenances of the vessel, or for a wilful injury thereto or to the vessel, forfeits all wages due for the voyage.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

876.

A mate or seaman may not, under any pretext, ship goods on his own account without permission from the master.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 5. PILOTS FOR MONTEREY BAY AND THE BAYS OF SAN FRANCISCO, SAN PABLO, AND SUISUN  [1100. - 1281.]



CHAPTER 1. Pilots [1100. - 1146.]



  ARTICLE 1. Legislative Policy and Findings [1100. - 1102.]

1100.

The Legislature finds and declares that it is the policy of the state to ensure the safety of persons, vessels, and property using Monterey Bay and the Bays of San Francisco, San Pablo, and Suisun, and the tributaries thereof, and to avoid damage to those waters and surrounding ecosystems as a result of vessel collision or damage, by providing competent, efficient, and regulated pilotage for vessels required by this division to secure pilotage services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 177, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1101.

The Legislature further finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The maritime industry is necessary for the continued economic well-being and cultural development of all California citizens.

(b) The Bays of San Francisco, San Pablo, and Suisun provide a vital transportation route for the maritime industry.

(c) The increase in vessel size and traffic, and the increase in cargoes carried in bulk, particularly oil and gas and hazardous chemicals, create substantial hazards to the life, property, and values associated with the environment of those waters.

(d) The federal government has long adopted the policy of providing minimum standards that ensure port and waterway safety while encouraging state control over pilot qualifications and licensing.

(e) A program of pilot regulation and licensing is necessary in order to ascertain and guarantee the qualifications, fitness, and reliability of qualified personnel who can provide safe pilotage of vessels entering and using Monterey Bay and the Bays of San Francisco, San Pablo, and Suisun.

(f) The need to ensure safe and pollution-free waterborne commerce requires that pilotage services be employed in the confined, crowded, and environmentally sensitive waters of those bays.

(g) Bar pilotage in the Bays of San Francisco, San Pablo, and Suisun has continuously been regulated by a single-purpose state board since 1850, and that regulation and licensing should be continued. 

(h) The individual physical safety and well-being of pilots is of vital importance in providing required pilot services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 177, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1102.

The Legislature finds and declares that the enhancement of navigational safety is of the utmost concern in state pilotage. In order to ensure and promote the highest level of safety in pilotage, the board is empowered to effectively monitor and oversee the practices of pilots and prevent fatigue resulting from extended hours of service, insufficient rest within a 24-hour period, and disruption of circadian rhythms.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 794, Sec. 1.   (SB 1408)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Application [1105. - 1107.]

1105.

This division applies to pilots for Monterey Bay and the Bays of San Francisco, San Pablo, and Suisun.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 177, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1106.

No fine or other penalty authorized by the provisions of this division, nor any revocation or suspension of a pilot license or commission except as provided in Section 1180, may be imposed by the board without a full and open prior public hearing on the matter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1256.)
-------------------------------------------

1107.

If any provision of this division or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the validity of the remainder of the provisions of this division and their application to other persons or circumstances shall not be affected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1256.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Definitions [1110. - 1117.]

1110.

(a) “Bays of San Francisco, San Pablo, and Suisun” means all the waters of those bays and of the tributaries, ports, and harbors of those bays, and includes the water areas from the south end of San Francisco Bay and from the Ports of Sacramento and Stockton to the Golden Gate Bridge. “Bay of San Francisco, San Pablo, or Suisun” means any of those waters, respectively.

(b) “Monterey Bay” means all the waters of that bay and of the tributaries, ports, and harbors of that bay.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 177, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1111.

“Board” means the Board of Pilot Commissioners for the Bays of San Francisco, San Pablo, and Suisun.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1422, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1112.

“High seas” includes all the navigable waters of the Pacific Ocean west of the Golden Gate Bridge, and all navigable waters west of the westward boundary of the pilotage grounds for Monterey Bay.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 177, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1113.

“Inland pilot” means a person holding an inland pilot license prior to January 1, 2011.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 324, Sec. 1.   (AB 1025)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1114.

“Pilot” means any of the following:

(a) Any person licensed under the authority of this division to pilot vessels other than an inland pilot. 

(b) Any person licensed as a bar pilot for the Bays of San Francisco, San Pablo, and Suisun prior to January 1, 1985. 

(c) Any existing inland pilot who becomes a pilot pursuant to Section 1141.

(d) Any pilot licensed pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1171.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 177, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1114.5.

“Pilotage grounds” means all waters extending eastward from the precautionary area surrounding buoy SF to, and including, the Bays of San Francisco, San Pablo, and Suisun, and also includes the waters of Monterey Bay, eastward of a straight line drawn between Point Santa Cruz Light and Point Pinos Light.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 177, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1115.

“Plan” or “pension” or “pension plan” means the San Francisco Pilot Pension Plan established pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1160) of this division.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 1113 by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1653, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

1116.

“Vessel” means all vessels not exempted under provisions of this division.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 1114 by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1653, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

1117.

“Commission investigator” means a person employed by or under contract with the board and assigned to investigate and report on a navigational incident involving a vessel piloted by a pilot or inland pilot licensed by the board, or other matter, incident, misconduct, suspected safety violation, or other activity reported to, or identified by, the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 567, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Liability of Persons Using Pilot Services [1120. - 1122.]

1120.

Vessels which use pilotage services, and their tackle, apparel, furniture, and other appurtenances, and their owners, operators, and agents are jointly and severally liable for pilotage fees and for the surcharges established pursuant to this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 468, Sec. 1.   Effective August 8, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

1121.

If any pilot, in endeavoring to assist or relieve any vessel in distress, suffers loss or damage to the pilot’s vessel, the owner and operator of the distressed vessel are jointly and severally liable for the loss or damage.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1653, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

1122.

In the event a pilot is carried to sea against the pilot’s will, or unnecessarily detained on board a vessel when a pilot vessel is in attendance to receive the pilot,
 the owner, operator, and agents of the detaining vessel are jointly and severally liable for paying the amount specified in this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 769, Sec. 1.   (AB 2056)   Effective September 29, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Exclusive Rights of Pilotage [1125. - 1126.]

1125.

(a) Pilots licensed by the board have exclusive authority, to the extent not provided otherwise by federal law, to pilot vessels from the high seas to Monterey Bay and the Bays of San Francisco, San Pablo, and Suisun and the ports thereof, and from those bays and ports to the high seas. They shall also have exclusive authority to pilot vessels within and along the waters of those bays, except as otherwise set forth in this division.

(b) Nothing in this division shall interfere with pilotage regulations of Monterey Bay and of the Ports of Sacramento and Stockton, nor prevent the regulatory authority of those ports from utilizing the pilots licensed pursuant to this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 177, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1126.

(a) A person who does not hold a license as a pilot issued pursuant to this division, and who pilots any vessel into or out of any harbor or port of Monterey Bay and the Bay of San Francisco, San Pablo, or Suisun, or who acts as a pilot for ship movements or special operations upon the waters of any of those bays, is guilty of a misdemeanor. In addition to the fines or other penalties provided by law, the court may order that person to pay to the pilot who is entitled to pilot the vessel the amount of pilotage fees collected. No fees shall be paid for pilotage if a state-licensed pilot refuses to join the vessel under paragraph (5) of subdivision (c).

(b) A person may also be enjoined
 from engaging in the pilotage prescribed by subdivision (a) by a court of competent jurisdiction.

(c) This section does not apply to any of the following persons:

(1) The master of a vessel who has relieved the pilot to ensure the safe operation of the vessel, but only from the point where the pilot is relieved to the closest safe berth or anchorage, or the high seas if closer than a safe berth or anchorage.

(2) Persons piloting vessels pursuant to the valid regulatory authority of the Port of Sacramento or the Port of Stockton.

(3) Persons piloting vessels sailing under an enrollment, as specified in Section 1127.

(4) Persons piloting vessels pursuant to Section 1179.

(5) Persons piloting vessels if a state-licensed pilot refuses to join the vessel. However, a vessel may not hire a pilot not licensed by the state until a representative of the vessel notifies the port agent or his or her designee that the vessel will hire a pilot not licensed by the state unless a state-licensed pilot offers to join the vessel immediately. The port agent or his or her designee shall notify the executive director of the board or his or her designee that this paragraph applies.

(d) The exemption set forth in paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) does not apply in instances in which a state licensed pilot refuses to join a vessel because of suspected safety violations concerning that vessel’s pilot hoists or pilot ladders.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 324, Sec. 2.   (AB 1025)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Exempt Vessels and Vessels Liable for Pilotage [1127. - 1128.]

1127.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that it is the policy of the state to ensure the safety of persons, property, and vessels using the waters of Monterey Bay and the Bays of San Francisco, San Pablo, and Suisun and to avoid damage to those waters and surrounding ecosystems as a result of vessel collision or damage by providing competent, efficient, and regulated pilotage for vessels required by this division to secure pilotage services.

(b) This section does not supersede, modify, or otherwise alter pilot practices that are not safety related, including, but not limited to, the determination of rates charged for pilot services or employer-employee relationships for individuals, agencies, or organizations involved in
 providing pilotage services between any port of Monterey Bay and the Bays of San Francisco, San Pablo, and Suisun and any other port of the United States that is in existence on December 31, 1995, or otherwise abridge the authority of local port or harbor districts relating to pilotage in effect on December 31, 1995.

(c) The board shall regulate pilotage on waters of the state as provided in this division.

(d) A vessel sailing under a coastwise license or appropriately endorsed registry and engaged in the coasting trade between a port of Monterey Bay and the Bays of San Francisco, San Pablo, and Suisun and another port of the United States is exempt from all pilotage charges unless a pilot is actually employed. A foreign vessel and a vessel bound between a foreign port and a port of Monterey Bay and the Bays of San Francisco, San Pablo, and Suisun, and a vessel sailing under a
 register between a port of Monterey Bay and the Bays of San Francisco, San Pablo, and Suisun and another port of the United States, shall use a pilot holding a license issued pursuant to this division, except as otherwise provided by law.

(e) Subdivision (d) does not apply to a vessel that is less than 750 gross tons and is manufactured and used for private recreation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 324, Sec. 3.   (AB 1025)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1128.

Any nonself-propelled vessel in tow of a tug within Monterey Bay and the Bay of San Francisco, San Pablo, or Suisun, or between those bays, is exempt from pilotage charges unless a pilot is actually employed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 177, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Duties of Pilots [1130. - 1139.]

1130.

(a) A majority of all of the pilots licensed by the board shall appoint one pilot to act as port agent to carry out the orders of the board and other applicable laws, and to otherwise administer the affairs of the pilots. The appointment is subject to the confirmation of the board.

(b) The port agent shall be responsible for the general supervision and management of all matters related to the business and official duties of pilots licensed by the board.

(c) The port agent shall immediately notify the executive director of the board of a suspected violation, navigational incident, misconduct, or other rules violation that is reported to him or her or to which he
 or she is a witness. The board shall adopt regulations for the manner and content of a notice provided pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 576, Sec. 1.   (SB 300)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

1131.

Pilots shall at all times keep, for their exclusive use, vessels of such description and condition as the board may direct.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1256.)
-------------------------------------------

1132.

Every pilot in charge of a vessel arriving in Monterey Bay and the Bay of San Francisco, San Pablo, or Suisun, shall safely moor the vessel in place and position as directed by the master of the vessel, consistent with safe navigation and not contrary to law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 177, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1133.

Every pilot in charge of a vessel leaving the Bays of San Francisco, San Pablo, and Suisun shall pilot it from its point of departure to a point beyond the San Francisco bar. Every pilot in charge of a vessel leaving Monterey Bay shall pilot it from its point of departure to a point westward of the pilotage grounds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 177, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1134.

When a pilot goes aboard a vessel, the pilot becomes a servant of the vessel and its owner and operator. Nothing in this division exempts the vessel or its owner or operator from liability to persons or property for damage or loss caused by the vessel or its operation on the ground that (1) the vessel was piloted by a pilot, or (2) the damage or loss was incurred as a result of the error, omission, fault, or neglect of a pilot.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 669, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

1136.

A pilot licensed pursuant to this division shall do all of the following:

(a) Take an oath of office in the manner prescribed by law.

(b) Submit monthly to the board a verified account of all moneys or other compensation received by the pilot as a result of pilotage services, or by any other person for the pilot, or on the pilot’s account, on the forms furnished by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 324, Sec. 4.   (AB 1025)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1137.

(a) The account required pursuant to Section 1136 shall show all of the following:

(1) The name of each vessel piloted.

(2) The name of each vessel for which pilotage has been charged or collected.

(3) The amount charged to or collected for each vessel.

(4) Any rebates made and allowed and for what amounts.

(5) The amount of the fees and surcharges not collected pursuant to
 Section 1193.

(6) The depth of each vessel’s draft and its highest gross tonnage.

(7) Whether the vessel was inward or outward bound.

(b) The board shall record the accounts in full detail in a book prepared for that purpose. The account book is a public record.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 455, Sec. 2.   (AB 1888)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

1138.

(a) When cruising offshore or standing out to sea, pilots shall go to the vessel nearest to shore or in the most distress, or incur a penalty of one hundred dollars ($100). For each refusal by a pilot to board a vessel when required, a penalty of one hundred dollars ($100) shall be incurred.

(b) A pilot may be suspended or expelled by the board for a violation of subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1256.)
-------------------------------------------

1139.

(a) Every pilot boarding a vessel shall exhibit his commission or license as pilot when requested by the master of such vessel.

(b) The board may suspend or revoke the commission or license of a pilot for refusal to exhibit such commission or license upon the proper request, and it may impose a liability of fifty dollars ($50) on the bond of such pilot.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1256.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. State Certified Pilotage [1140. - 1146.]

1140.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to provide for a unified system of state regulated pilotage for Monterey Bay and the Bays of San Francisco, San Pablo, and Suisun.

(b) The Legislature finds and declares that unified pilotage will be beneficial to the safety of people, vessels, and property using those bays and tributaries.

(c) The Legislature further finds and declares that unified systems of regulated pilotage are common to the ports of the world and are most familiar to, and best able to serve, both foreign and domestic vessels.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 324, Sec. 5.   (AB 1025)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1141.

(a) Each pilot license shall be valid for a period of one year and shall be renewed upon application and successful completion of the physical examination required by Section 1176.

(b) A pilot license shall not be renewed if the pilot possessing the license does not actively pilot vessels for any consecutive period of one year, unless the board determines the pilot is qualified and makes one of the following findings:

(1) The pilot has presented satisfactory proof of medical disability during that period. 

(2) The board has granted the pilot a leave of absence without pay during that period. 

(3) The pilot has been serving as port agent under Section 1130. 

(c) A pilot licensee shall at all times hold an active and proper license to pilot vessels on the waters on which the pilot operates. 

(d) The board may revoke or suspend the license of any pilot who does not use proper equipment maintained exclusively for pilotage or who operates on territorial waters not described in the license. This subdivision shall not be construed to require the use of a pilot boat in order to provide pilotage services for Monterey Bay.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 177, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1144.

Any continuing education program adopted by the board shall regularly inform pilots of the hazards of fatigue and of effective strategies to prevent fatigue while on duty.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 794, Sec. 2.   (SB 1408)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1146.

A pilot shall refuse a pilotage assignment if he or she is physically or mentally fatigued and has a reasonable belief that the assignment cannot be carried out in a competent and safe manner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 794, Sec. 3.   (SB 1408)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Board of Pilot Commissioners [1150. - 1159.2.]

1150.

(a) There is in the Transportation Agency a Board of Pilot Commissioners for the Bays of San Francisco, San Pablo, and Suisun, consisting of seven members appointed by the Governor, with the consent of the Senate, as follows:

(1) Two members shall be pilots licensed pursuant to this division.

(2) Two members shall represent the industry and shall be persons currently engaged as owners, officers, directors, employees, or representatives of a firm or association of firms that is a substantial user of pilotage service in the Bay of San Francisco, San Pablo, Suisun, or Monterey, one of whom shall be engaged in the field of